California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) Effective July 1, 2002, payment for enteral nutrition products dispensed by a pharmacy provider shall be based on the estimated acquisition cost for that product plus a percentage markup to be determined by the department in consultation with provider representatives from the California Association of Medical Product Suppliers and the California Pharmacists Association. Any changes to the percentage markup may be implemented with 30-day notice to the provider community via a provider bulletin or other specific notification to
 providers.

(b) In determining the estimated acquisition cost of products pursuant to this section, the department shall consider provider related costs of the products that include, but are not limited to, shipping, handling, storage, and delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 68.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.86.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) (A) “Average sales price” means the price reported to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services by the manufacturer pursuant to Section 1847A of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-3a).

(B) “Average manufacturer price” means the price reported to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to Section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8).

(2) “Blood factors” means plasma protein therapies and their recombinant analogs.
 Blood factors include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Coagulation factors, including:

(i) Factor VIII, nonrecombinant.

(ii) Factor VIII, porcine.

(iii) Factor VIII, recombinant.

(iv) Factor IX, nonrecombinant.

(v) Factor IX, complex.

(vi) Factor IX, recombinant.

(vii) Antithrombin III.

(viii) Anti-inhibitor factor.

(ix) Von Willebrand factor.

(x) Factor VIIa, recombinant.

(B) Immune Globulin Intravenous.

(C) Alpha-1 Proteinase Inhibitor.

(b) The reimbursement for blood factors shall be by national drug code number and shall not exceed 120 percent of the average sales price of the last quarter reported.

(c) The average sales price for blood factors of manufacturers or distributors that do not report an average sales price pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be identical to the average manufacturer price. The average sales price for new products that do not have a calculable average sales price or average manufacturer price shall be equal to a projected sales price, as reported by the manufacturer to the department. Manufacturers
 reporting a projected sales price for a new product shall report the first monthly average manufacturer price reported to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The reporting of an average sales price that does not meet the requirement of this subdivision shall result in that blood factor no longer being considered a covered benefit.

(d) The average sales price shall be reported at the national drug code level to the department on a quarterly basis.

(e) (1) Effective July 1, 2008, the department shall collect a state rebate, in addition to rebates pursuant to other provisions of state or federal law, for blood factors reimbursed pursuant to this section by programs that qualify for federal drug rebates pursuant to Section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8) or otherwise qualify for federal funds under Title XIX of
 the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) pursuant to the Medicaid state plan or waivers and the programs authorized by Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 125125) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of, Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Upon implementation of paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 14105.33 for blood factors pursuant to this section, “utilization data” used to determine the state rebate shall be described pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14105.33. The department shall post on its Internet Web site a notice that it has implemented paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 14105.33 for blood factors pursuant to this section.

(3) The state rebate shall be negotiated as necessary between the department and the manufacturer. Manufacturers who do
 not execute an agreement to pay additional rebates pursuant to this section shall have their blood factors available only through an approved treatment or service authorization request. All blood factors that meet the definition of a covered outpatient drug pursuant to Section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8) shall remain a benefit subject to the utilization controls provided for in this section.

(4) In reviewing authorization requests, the department shall approve the lowest net cost product that meets the beneficiary’s medical need. The review of medical need shall take into account a beneficiary’s clinical history or the use of the blood factor pursuant to payment by another third party, or both.

(f) A beneficiary may obtain blood factors that require a treatment or service authorization request pursuant to subdivision (e) if the beneficiary
 qualifies for continuing care status. To be eligible for continuing care status, a beneficiary must be taking the blood factor and the department has reimbursed a claim for the blood factor with a date of service that is within 100 days prior to the date the blood factor was placed on treatment authorization request status. A beneficiary may remain eligible for continuing care status, provided that a claim is submitted for the blood factor in question at least every 100 days and the date of service of the claim is within 100 days of the date of service of the last claim submitted for the same blood factor.

(g) Changes made to the list of covered blood factors under this or any other section shall be exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code), and shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 30, Sec. 27.   (SB 833)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.94.

(a) An eligible provider, as described in subdivision (b), may, in addition to the rate of payment that the provider would otherwise receive for Medi-Cal ground emergency medical transportation services, receive supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement to the extent provided in this section.

(b) A provider shall be eligible for supplemental reimbursement if the provider has all of the following characteristics continuously during a state fiscal year:

(1) Provides ground emergency medical transportation services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(2) Is a provider that is
 enrolled as a Medi-Cal provider for the period being claimed.

(3) Is owned or operated by the state, a city, county, city and county, fire protection district organized pursuant to Part 2.7 (commencing with Section 13800) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code, special district organized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 58000) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code, community services district organized pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 61000) of Division 3 of Title 6 of the Government Code, health care district organized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 32000) of Division 23 of the Health and Safety Code, or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(c) An eligible provider’s supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be
 calculated and paid as follows:

(1) The supplemental reimbursement to an eligible provider, as described in subdivision (b), shall be equal to the amount of federal financial participation received as a result of the claims submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f).

(2) The amount certified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), when combined with the amount received from all other sources of reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program, shall not exceed 100 percent of actual costs, as determined pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan, for ground emergency medical transportation services.

(3) The supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement provided by this section shall be distributed exclusively to eligible providers
 under a payment methodology based on ground emergency medical transportation services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries by eligible providers on a per-transport basis or other federally permissible basis. The department shall obtain approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the payment methodology to be utilized, and may not make any payment pursuant to this section prior to obtaining that approval.

(d) (1) It is the Legislature’s intent in enacting this section to provide the supplemental reimbursement described in this section without any expenditure from the General Fund. An eligible provider, as a condition of receiving supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section, shall enter into, and maintain, an agreement with the department for the purposes of implementing this
 section and reimbursing the department for the costs of administering this section.

(2) The nonfederal share of the supplemental reimbursement submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for purposes of claiming federal financial participation shall be paid only with funds from the governmental entities described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and certified to the state as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) Participation in the program by an eligible provider described in this section is voluntary. If an applicable governmental entity elects to seek supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section on behalf of an eligible provider owned or operated by the entity, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the governmental entity shall do all
 of the following:

(1) Certify, in conformity with the requirements of Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that the claimed expenditures for the ground emergency medical transportation services are eligible for federal financial participation.

(2) Provide evidence supporting the certification as specified by the department.

(3) Submit data as specified by the department to determine the appropriate amounts to claim as expenditures qualifying for federal financial participation.

(4) Keep, maintain, and have readily retrievable, any records specified by the department to fully disclose reimbursement amounts to which the
 eligible provider is entitled, and any other records required by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
 Services.

(f) (1) The department shall promptly seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. The department may limit the program to those costs that are allowable expenditures under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.). If federal approval is not obtained for implementation of this section, this section shall not be implemented.

(2) The department shall submit claims for federal financial participation for the expenditures for the services described in subdivision (e) that are allowable
 expenditures under federal law.

(3) The department shall annually submit any necessary materials to the federal government to provide assurances that claims for federal financial participation will include only those expenditures that are allowable under federal law.

(g) (1) If a final judicial determination is made by any court of appellate jurisdiction or a final determination is made by the administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that the supplemental reimbursement provided for in this section must be made to any provider not described in this section, the director shall execute a declaration stating that the determination has been made and on that date this section shall become inoperative.

(2) The declaration executed pursuant to this subdivision shall be retained by the director, provided to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature, the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel, and posted on the department’s internet website.

(h) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement and administer this section by means of provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall become inoperative during the entirety of any Medi-Cal managed care rating
 period in which Section 14105.945 is implemented, in whole or in part. The department may conduct any necessary and remaining administrative duties related to any time period during which this provision remained operative, even after this section becomes inoperative, and may receive all compensation for those activities until paid in full.

(j) The department, in its sole discretion, may determine it has received all compensation for activities conducted pursuant to this section and completed all administrative duties related to time periods when this section was operative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 544, Sec. 1.   (AB 1705)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section inoperative as prescribed by its own conditions.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.945.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Eligible provider” means a provider who is eligible for reimbursement of Medi-Cal emergency medical transports pursuant to this section, and who continually meets all of the following requirements during the entirety of any Medi-Cal managed care rating period that this section is implemented:

(A) Provides emergency medical
 transports
 to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(B) Is enrolled as a Medi-Cal provider for the period being claimed.

(C) Is owned or operated by the state, a city, county, city and county, fire protection district organized pursuant to Part 2.7 (commencing with Section 13800) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code, special district organized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 58000) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code, community services district organized pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 61000) of Division 3 of Title 6 of the Government Code, health care district organized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 32000) of Division 23 of the Health and Safety Code, or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(2) (A) “Emergency medical transport” means the act of transporting an individual from any point of origin to the nearest medical facility capable of meeting the emergency medical needs of the patient by an ambulance licensed, operated, and equipped in accordance with applicable state or local statutes, ordinances, or regulations that are billed with billing codes A0429 BLS Emergency, A0434 Specialty Care Transport, A0225 Neonatal Emergency Transport, A0427 ALS Emergency, and A0433 ALS2, and any equivalent, predecessor, or successor billing codes, as may be determined by the director.

(B) “Emergency medical transport” shall not include transportation of beneficiaries by passenger car, taxicab, litter van, wheelchair van, or other forms of public or private
 conveyances, nor shall it include transportation by an air ambulance provider. An “emergency medical transport” does not occur if a transport is not provided following evaluation of a patient.

(3) “Medi-Cal managed care rating period” means a period selected by the department for which the actuarially sound capitation rates are developed and documented in the rate certification that the department submits to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as required by Section 438.7(a) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) (1) Commencing no sooner than July 1, 2021, the department shall implement the Public Provider Intergovernmental Transfer Program (program) pursuant to this section for any Medi-Cal managed care rating period that the
 department has obtained necessary federal approvals.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, during the entirety of any Medi-Cal managed care rating period for which the requirements of this section are implemented, in whole or in part, supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursements described in Section 14105.94 shall become inoperative.

(c) To the extent authorized under federal and state law, an eligible provider shall receive increased reimbursement by application of an add-on increase, as determined pursuant to subdivision (d), to the associated Medi-Cal fee-for-service payment schedule for emergency medical transports provided to applicable Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(d) The department shall develop the
 statewide add-on increase to be provided under the program as follows:

(1) The department shall determine an initial statewide add-on increase that is based on the most recent audited cost reports of eligible providers available at the time the add-on increase is developed, as determined by the department. In determining the initial statewide add-on increase, the department may make adjustments to account for inflation, trend, or other material changes, as appropriate under federal law and actuarial standards.

(2) The initial statewide add-on increase shall represent the difference between both of the following:

(A) The average reimbursement paid pursuant to the applicable base Medi-Cal fee-for-service payment fee
 schedule for an emergency medical transport during the time period of the applicable cost-report to an eligible provider, and weighted according to those services provided by all eligible providers during
 the applicable time period.

(B) The average cost directly associated with providing a Medi-Cal emergency medical transport under the Medi-Cal program by an eligible provider during the time period of the applicable cost-report, as determined based on all eligible providers’ audited cost reports pursuant to paragraph (1), and weighted according to those services provided by all eligible providers during the applicable time period.

(3) For subsequent Medi-Cal managed care rating periods, the department, in consultation with participating eligible providers, and as determined by the department, may adjust periodically the initial statewide add-on increase to account for inflation, trend adjustments, or other material changes, as appropriate under federal law and
 actuarial standards.

(4) To the extent that the department deems practicable, the department shall set a schedule for determining the statewide add-on increase before the department submits to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services actuarially sound Medi-Cal managed care rates for an applicable Medi-Cal managed care rating period pursuant to subdivision (e).

(5) Once the department determines the add-on increase for a Medi-Cal managed care rating period, the add-on increase shall not be modified for that rating period unless the modification is required for purposes of receiving federal approval or claiming federal financial participation for the requirements of this section.

(e) (1) A Medi-Cal managed care health plan shall satisfy its obligation under Section 438.114(c) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations for emergency medical transport, and shall provide payment to applicable noncontract emergency medical transport providers consistent with Section 1396u-2(b)(2)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) During the entirety of any Medi-Cal managed care rating period that this section is implemented, the amounts a noncontract eligible provider may collect if a Medi-Cal beneficiary received medical assistance other than through enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care health plan pursuant to Section 1396u-2(b)(2)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code shall be the resulting Medi-Cal fee-for-service payment schedule amounts after the application of the add-on increase described in this
 section. During the Medi-Cal managed care rating period that the requirements of this section are implemented, any reimbursement to a noncontract emergency medical transport provider that is not an eligible provider shall be made in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 14129.3.

(f) The Medi-Cal reimbursement provided by this section shall be distributed exclusively to eligible providers under a payment methodology based on emergency medical transport provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries by eligible providers on a per-transport basis or other federally permissible basis.

(g) During the entirety of any Medi-Cal managed care rating period that this section is implemented, in whole or in part, the department shall provide appropriate funding to each applicable Medi-Cal
 managed care plan to account for the add-on increase obligations of these plans pursuant to this section in federally approved risk based capitation rates developed in accordance with Section 14301.1.

(h) (1) For any Medi-Cal managed care rating period that this section is implemented, the nonfederal share, which is associated with the add-on increase as it applies to the Medi-Cal fee-for-service payment schedule and the portion of the risk-based capitation rate to Medi-Cal managed care health plans, may consist of voluntary intergovernmental transfers of funds provided by eligible providers and their affiliated governmental entities or other public entities pursuant to Section 14164, as applicable. Upon providing any intergovernmental transfer of funds, each transferring entity shall certify, in the form and manner specified
 by the department, that the transferred funds qualify for federal financial participation pursuant to applicable laws relating to the federal Medicaid program. Any intergovernmental transfer of funds made pursuant to this section shall be voluntary for purposes of federal law.

(2) The department shall assess a 10-percent fee on each transfer of public funds to the state pursuant to this subdivision to pay for health care coverage and to reimburse the department for its costs associated with administering the program. Excluding this fee, the department shall not assess a percentage fee in connection with any intergovernmental transfer of funds made pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) The department shall develop and maintain, in consultation with participating eligible
 providers, a protocol and schedule for funding the nonfederal share of expenditures during a Medi-Cal managed care rating period that this section is implemented using voluntary intergovernmental transfers.

(4) This section does not limit or otherwise alter any existing authority of the department to accept intergovernmental transfers for purposes of funding the nonfederal share of expenditures in the Medi-Cal program.

(i) During the entirety of any Medi-Cal managed care rating period for which this section is implemented, in whole or in part, an eligible provider shall be exempt from the quality assurance fee and add-on increase pursuant to Article 3.91 (commencing with Section 14129).

(j) This section
 shall cease to be operative on the first day of the Medi-Cal managed care rating period beginning on or after the date the department determines, after consultation with participating eligible providers, that implementation of this section is no longer financially and programmatically supportive of the Medi-Cal
 program. The department shall make this determination if the projected amount of nonfederal share funds available for an applicable Medi-Cal managed care rating period is insufficient to support implementation of this section in the subject Medi-Cal managed care rating period. The department shall post notice of the determination on its internet website.

(k) The director may modify any process or methodology specified in this section to the extent necessary to comply with state or federal law or regulations, or to secure or maintain federal approval or federal financial participation. If the director determines, after consulting with participating eligible providers, that a modification to the process or methodology is necessary, the director shall execute a declaration stating that this determination has been made and
 describing the modification. The director shall retain the declaration and provide a copy, within five working days of the execution of the declaration, to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The director shall post the declaration on the department’s internet website.

(l) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, plan letters, or other similar instructions without taking regulatory action.

(m) (1) The department shall implement this section only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary
 federal approvals are obtained.

(2) The department shall promptly seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section for an applicable Medi-Cal managed care rating period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 544, Sec. 2.   (AB 1705)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section inoperative as prescribed by its own conditions.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.95.

(a) Each eligible facility, as described in subdivision (b), may, in addition to the rate of payment that the facility would otherwise receive for adult day health services, receive supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement to the extent provided in this section.

(b) A facility shall be eligible for supplemental reimbursement only if the facility has all of the following characteristics continuously during a state fiscal year commencing with the 2002
 fiscal year, and thereafter:

(1) Provides services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(2) Is an adult day health center, licensed pursuant to Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 1570) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Is owned or operated by a county, city, city and county, or health care district organized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 32000) of Division 23 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) An eligible facility’s supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be calculated and paid as follows:

(1) The supplemental reimbursement to an eligible facility, as described in subdivision (b), shall be equal to the amount of federal financial participation
 received as a result of the claims submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(2) In no instance shall the amount certified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), when combined with the amount received from all other sources of reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program, exceed 100 percent of projected costs, as determined pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan, for adult day health services at each facility.

(3) The supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement provided by this section shall be distributed under a payment methodology based on adult day health services provided to Medi-Cal patients at the eligible facility, either on a per-visit basis or any other federally permissible basis. The department shall seek approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the payment methodology to be utilized, and may not make any payment pursuant to this
 section prior to obtaining that approval.

(d) (1) It is the Legislature’s intent in enacting this section to provide the supplemental reimbursement described in this section without any expenditure from the General Fund.

(2) The state share of the supplemental reimbursement submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for purposes of claiming federal financial participation shall be paid only with funds from the governmental entities described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and certified to the state as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) A particular governmental entity described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), on behalf of any eligible facility owned or operated by the entity shall do all of the following:

(1) Certify, in conformity with the requirements of Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that the claimed expenditures for outpatient services are eligible for federal financial participation.

(2) Provide evidence supporting the certification as specified by the department.

(3) Submit data as specified by the department to determine the appropriate amounts to claim as expenditures qualifying for federal financial participation.

(4) Keep, maintain, and have readily retrievable, any records specified by the department to fully disclose reimbursement amounts to which the eligible facility is entitled, and any other records required by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(f) An eligible facility as
 described in subdivision (b), as a condition of receiving supplemental reimbursement under this section, shall enter into, and maintain, a contract with the department for the purpose of implementing this section, and to reimburse the department for its administrative costs of implementing this section.

(g) (1) The department shall promptly seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. If necessary to obtain federal approval, the department may limit the program to those costs that are allowable expenditures under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code). If federal approval is not obtained for implementation of this section, this section shall become inoperative.

(2) The department shall submit claims for federal financial
 participation for the expenditures for the services described in subdivision (e) that are allowable expenditures under federal law.

(3) The department shall, on an annual basis, submit any necessary materials to the federal government to provide assurances that claims for federal financial participation will include only those expenditures that are allowable under federal law.

(h) All funds expended pursuant to this section are subject to review and audit by the department.

(i) This section shall become inoperative in the event, and on the date, of a final judicial determination by any court of appellate jurisdiction or a final determination by the administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that the supplemental reimbursement provided in this section must be made to any facility not
 described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 331.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (i).)
-------------------------------------------

14105.96.

(a) Each eligible facility, as described in subdivision (b), may, in addition to the rate of payment that the facility would otherwise receive for Medi-Cal outpatient services, receive supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement to the extent provided in this section.

(b) A facility shall be eligible for supplemental reimbursement only if the facility has all of the following characteristics continuously during a state fiscal year commencing with the 2002
 fiscal year, and thereafter:

(1) Provides services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(2) Is an acute care hospital providing outpatient hospital services. For purposes of this paragraph, “acute care hospital” means the facilities described by subdivision (a) or (b), or both, of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Is owned or operated by a county, city, city and county, the University of California, or health care district organized pursuant to Division 23 (commencing with Section 32000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) An eligible facility’s supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be calculated and paid as follows:

(1) The supplemental reimbursement to an eligible
 facility, as described in subdivision (b), shall be equal to the amount of federal financial participation received as a result of the claims submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(2) In no instance shall the amount certified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), when combined with the amount received from all other sources of reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program, exceed 100 percent of projected costs, as determined pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan, for outpatient services at each facility.

(3) The supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement provided by this section shall be distributed under a payment methodology based on outpatient services provided to Medi-Cal patients at the eligible facility, either on a per-visit basis, per-procedure basis, or any other federally permissible basis. The department shall seek approval from the federal Centers for
 Medicare and Medicaid Services for the payment methodology to be utilized, and may not make any payment pursuant to this section prior to obtaining that approval.

(d) (1) It is the Legislature’s intent in enacting this section to provide the supplemental reimbursement described in this section without any expenditure from the General Fund.

(2) The state share of the supplemental reimbursement submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for purposes of claiming federal financial participation shall be paid only with funds from the governmental entities described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and certified to the state as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) A particular governmental entity, described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), on behalf of any eligible facility
 owned or operated by the entity, shall do all of the following:

(1) Certify, in conformity with the requirements of Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that the claimed expenditures for the outpatient services are eligible for federal financial participation.

(2) Provide evidence supporting the certification as specified by the department.

(3) Submit data as specified by the department to determine the appropriate amounts to claim as expenditures qualifying for federal financial participation.

(4) Keep, maintain, and have readily retrievable, any records specified by the department to fully disclose reimbursement amounts to which the eligible facility is entitled, and any other records required by the federal Centers for
 Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(f) An eligible facility as described in subdivision (b), as a condition of receiving supplemental reimbursement under this section, shall enter into and maintain a contract with the department for the purpose of implementing this section, and to reimburse the department for its administrative costs of operating this program.

(g) (1) The department shall promptly seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. If necessary to obtain federal approval, the department may limit the program to those costs that are allowable expenditures under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code). If federal approval is not obtained for implementation of this section, this section shall become inoperative.

(2) The department shall submit claims for federal financial participation for the expenditures for the services described in subdivision (e) that are allowable expenditures under federal law.

(3) The department shall, on an annual basis, submit any necessary materials to the federal government to provide assurances that claims for federal financial participation will include only those expenditures that are allowable under federal law.

(h) This section shall become inoperative in the event, and on the date, of a final judicial determination by any court of appellate jurisdiction or a final determination by the administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that the supplemental reimbursement provided in this section must be made to any facility not described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 332.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (h).)
-------------------------------------------

14105.97.

(a) The department shall annually develop an outpatient disproportionate share factor for each hospital in California that receives Medi-Cal payments for outpatient services. That factor shall be the ratio of the sum of Medi-Cal gross outpatient revenue, county indigent programs gross outpatient revenue, and the outpatient component of other charity deductions from revenue, to total gross outpatient revenue. A hospital with a disproportionate factor that exceeds the mean factor for all hospitals in the state shall receive supplemental
 Medi-Cal payments in direct proportion to the level of the hospital’s disproportionate factor. This subdivision shall only apply to payments for services provided by disproportionate share hospitals on or after July 1, 1993.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the outpatient disproportionate share factors for children’s hospitals shall be no less than the amounts that would have been established had the disproportionate factors for all hospitals been computed as the ratio of the sum of Medi-Cal gross outpatient revenue, the outpatient component of county indigent programs contractual adjustments, and the outpatient component of other charity deductions from revenue, to total gross outpatient revenue.

(c) The outpatient component of county indigent programs contractual adjustments shall be determined by calculating the ratio of county indigent programs gross outpatient revenue to
 county indigent programs gross total revenue, by multiplying that ratio by county indigent programs contractual adjustments. The outpatient component of other charity deductions from revenue shall be determined by calculating the ratio of other payors gross outpatient revenue to other payors gross total revenue, and multiplying that ratio by the sum of other charity deductions from revenue and teaching allowances for University of California teaching hospitals.

(d) For purposes of computing the outpatient disproportionate share factors, the department shall use the data from the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development quarterly financial and utilization reports, as adjusted by the office for the calendar year preceding the state fiscal year in which the disproportionate factors will be effective. The department shall use the data existing on the office’s statewide data base as of April 15 of each year. For the purposes of this
 section, a hospital shall submit to the office by April 1 of each year any adjustments to its quarterly reports for the preceding calendar year. The office shall make its statewide data base, as adjusted, available to the department by April 20 of each year.

(e) Augmentation rates shall be applied to hospitals with all inclusive rates at the point of final audit settlement and shall be included in subsequent interim reimbursement rates.
